src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 336K1
 +Inf:%>å # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>år # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>åas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>od # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ått # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ådd # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ådde # ;
 +Adj:%>åande # ;
 +Imp:%>å # ;

LEXICON 337
 +Inf:%>tre # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>tredast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tro # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>treden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj:%>tredande # ;
 +Imp:%>tre # ;

LEXICON 337K1
 +Inf:%>tre # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>tredas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tro # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>treden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj:%>tredande # ;
 +Imp:%>tre # ;

LEXICON 338
 +Inf:%>tre # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>tredast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tro # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>trede # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>trede # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>treden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj:%>tredande # ;
 +Imp:%>tre # ;

LEXICON 338K1
 +Inf:%>tre # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>trer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>tredas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>tro # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>trede # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>trede # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>treden # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>tredi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>tredne # ;
 +Adj:%>tredande # ;
 +Imp:%>tre # ;

LEXICON 340
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 340K1
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 340K2
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 340KL
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 341
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 341K1
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 341K2
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 341KL
 +Inf:%>dra # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>dreger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>dragast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>drog # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>drege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>dregen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>dregi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>dregne # ;
 +Adj:%>dragande # ;
 +Imp:%>dra # ;

LEXICON 342
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 342K1
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 342K2
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 342KL
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 343
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 343K1
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eg # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 343K2
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 343KL
 +Inf:%>age # ;
 +Inf:%>aga # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eger # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>agast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>og # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ege # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>egen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>egi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>egne # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>egne # ;
 +Adj:%>agande # ;
 +Imp:%>ag # ;

LEXICON 344
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 344K1
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 344K2
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 344KL
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 345
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 345K1
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 345K2
 +Inf:%>eje # ;
 +Inf:%>eja # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ejas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>ejande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;
