src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
avdra+V:avdr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4061
avdrage+V:avdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=4062
bedra+V:bedr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=5891
bedrage+V:bedr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=5892
drage+V:dr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=14864
fordrage+V:fordr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=24115
forsverje+V:forsv 345 ; ! LEMMA_ID=25183
handdra+V:handdr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34857
handdrage+V:handdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=34858
inndra+V:inndr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41323
inndrage+V:inndr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=41324
landdra+V:landdr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53883
landdrage+V:landdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=53884
oppdra+V:oppdr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66991
oppdrage+V:oppdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=66992
overdra+V:overdr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68064
overdrage+V:overdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=68065
pådra+V:pådr 341 ; ! LEMMA_ID=72638
pådrage+V:pådr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=72639
samansverje+V:samansv 345 ; ! LEMMA_ID=77294
seigdrage+V:seigdr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=78292
sverje+V:sv 345 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92712
bidrage+V:bidr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126123
unndrage+V:unndr 343 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126124
avsverje+V:avsv 345 ; ! LEMMA_ID=133598
